Utah statutes.
56-1-1.   Railroad corporations -- Powers and duties.

Railroad corporations heretofore organized and now existing or hereafter organized under the laws of this state shall be subject to all the duties imposed and shall have and possess all the powers and privileges conferred by this title, as well as the powers and privileges conferred by the laws under which said corporations were organized or which are contained in their articles of incorporation and are not inconsistent with the laws and Constitution of this state.



No Change Since 1953

